South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3568.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  (A) There is created the South Carolina Minority Health Disparities Study Committee to examine racial and ethnic health disparities. The committee shall: (1) establish measurable outcomes to reduce health disparities in the following priority areas: breast, cervical, prostate, and colorectal cancer screenings; HIV/AIDS; adult and child immunizations; and cardiovascular disease. To effectuate this purpose, the Department of Public Health shall enhance current data tools to ensure a statewide assessment of the risk behaviors associated with the health disparity priority areas identified in this item. To the extent feasible, the department shall conduct the assessment so that results may be compared to national data; (2) examine areas of improvement for public awareness, public education, research, and coordination regarding minority health disparities; (3) consider access and transportation issues that contribute to minority health disparities; and (4) make recommendations for closing gaps in minority health outcomes and increasing the public's awareness and understanding of health disparities that exist among racial and ethnic populations. (B) The committee must be comprised of: (1) three members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; (2) three members of the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate; (3) the Director of the Department of Public Health, or his designee; (4) the Director of the South Carolina Institute of Medicine and Public Health, or his designee; and (5) the Director of the South Carolina Hospital Association, or his designee. (C) A vacancy in the membership of the study committee must be filled in the manner of the original appointment. (D) Members of the committee shall serve without per diem, mileage, or other compensation generally provided to members of boards and commissions. (E) The Senate Medical Affairs Committee and the House Medical, Military, Public and Municipal Affairs Committee shall provide appropriate staffing for the study committee. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----